Idaho statutes. Title 49 MOTOR VEHICLES
Chapter 4 MOTOR VEHICLE REGISTRATION
§ 49-404A. Members of the armed forces reserve — Special plates.

Any active member of the armed forces reserves of the United States who is the owner of a vehicle registered under section 49-402(1) or section 49-434(1), Idaho Code, may, upon application to the department, register not more than two (2) motor vehicles and receive for each vehicle special license plates in lieu of regular numbered plates. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds. The special license plates shall be designated by the department with the word “RESERVIST” centered along the bottom edge and be numbered in sets of two (2) with a different number following appropriate letters as follows: United States Army Reserve: Army (number); United States Navy Reserve: Navy (number); United States Marine Corps Reserve: USMC (number); United States Air Force Reserve: USAF (number); and United States Coast Guard Reserve: USCG (number). Proof of being an active member in the United States armed forces reserves must be furnished to the department before special plates will be issued. Special license plates issued under this section shall be issued under the staggered registration process provided for in section 49-402(1), Idaho Code, or the annual registration in section 49-434(1), Idaho Code.

Any branch of the armed forces reserves of the United States shall, prior to an individual’s discharge from duty in that branch of the armed forces reserve, require that the special armed forces reserve license plates either be turned back to the department or exchanged for other proper license plates as a condition of discharge.

In addition to the regular registration fees required in section 49-402(1) or 49-434(1), Idaho Code, the applicant shall pay the initial program fee and the annual program fee specified in section 49-402, Idaho Code. The initial program fee and the annual program fee shall be deposited in the state highway account and shall be used to fund the cost of administration of this special license plate program which is provided to the public as a personal alternative to the standard license plate requirement. When a plate holder transfers or assigns his title or interest in the vehicle registered under this section, the registration shall expire, but the special plates may be transferred to another vehicle upon payment of the required transfer fee. Special plates shall only be displayed after receipt of the new registration.

The design and numbering scheme of the military reservist special plate shall be coordinated by the department with representatives of the armed forces reserves. However, the department shall have the final approval of the plate design and numbering scheme to ensure conformity within existing issues of plates and to contain costs within the limit of the fees received from applicants.

§ 49-405. Radio amateurs — Special license plates.

In order to enhance visibility and identification of radio amateurs during times of emergency any radio amateur residing in the state of Idaho, may, upon application to the department, register one (1) motor vehicle per radio license issued by the federal government and receive for that vehicle special license plates in lieu of regular license plates. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds. The number on the plates shall be the same combination of figures and letters that make up the radio call sign of the amateur radio operator.

Proof of holding an amateur license from the federal communications commission must be furnished to the department before the plates will be issued. Should the amateur’s radio license expire during any given year and not be renewed, the special license plates must be surrendered to the department and regular license plates obtained.

Radio amateurs will notify the department at a time to be set by the department of their intention to procure special license plates under the terms specified in this section. Failure to do so will result in the amateur being required to accept regular license plates should the department be unable to procure the special plates. Special plates may still be procured when available but amateurs will be subject to the usual transfer fee.

Whenever an amateur transfers or assigns his title or interest to a vehicle especially registered the registration shall expire, but the amateur may hold his special license plates which he may have reissued to him upon the payment of the required transfer fees. He may only display the plates after receipt of new registration from the department.

In addition to the regular registration fees required in section 49-402(1) or 49-434(1), Idaho Code, the applicant shall pay the plate fee specified in section 49-450, Idaho Code.

§ 49-406. Idaho old timer — Special license plate program — Registration and standard license plates.

Any motor vehicle manufactured prior to January 1, 1943, that is maintained to its original likeness using original-type parts and materials, without major modifications shall be known as an “Idaho Old Timer.” Any motor vehicle which is altered from its original design is not an “Idaho Old Timer” as herein defined.

Any motor vehicle which qualifies as an “Idaho Old Timer” shall be used for exhibits, parades, tours, club activities and such occasional use as is necessary for operation and maintenance of the vehicle, and shall not be used for business or commercial purposes or as customary and usual transportation.

Applicants for a special “Idaho Old Timer” license plate shall pay an initial program fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) and the license plate fee required in section 49-450, Idaho Code, for each “Idaho Old Timer” plate which shall be displayed on the rear of the vehicle. The initial program fee shall be deposited in the state highway account, and the plate manufacturing fee shall be deposited in the plate manufacturing account.

Once every three (3) years, on a schedule set by the department, an ownership verification form shall be mailed to each plate holder on file with the department. The owner shall provide such information as is requested by the department to verify ownership of the vehicle(s) and that the special license plate(s) is still in use by the owner. A fee of three dollars ($3.00) shall be charged by the department for each vehicle. This fee shall be deposited in the state highway account to defray costs of the license plate program. If the owner no longer has an interest in a vehicle(s) the owner may retain the plates as specified in subsection (7) of this section. If the ownership verification form is not returned by the date specified by the department, the registration record will be purged from the files of the department. Any further use of the plate is lost to the owner and the plate number becomes available for issue to another applicant.

An applicant for the special “Idaho Old Timer” plate shall execute an affidavit on a form provided by the department that the vehicle qualifies as an old timer and shall only be used for the purposes allowed.

If an “Idaho Old Timer” is to be used as customary and usual transportation, or for business or commercial purposes, the owner shall register the vehicle under the provisions of section 49-402, or section 49-434, Idaho Code, as applicable, and shall obtain and display the standard issue of license plates after payment of the plate fee required in section 49-450, Idaho Code. It shall be permissible to display both the standard issue of plates and the special “Idaho Old Timer” plate.
(7) Whenever title or interest in an Old Timer vehicle is transferred or assigned, the transferor may retain the plates for use on another vehicle which qualifies by providing the information required in subsection (5) of this section and by paying the required transfer fee. If the vehicle is also registered under the provisions of section 49-402 or section 49-434, Idaho Code, the provisions of section 49-431, Idaho Code, relating to the procedure for assignment and transfer of interest, shall apply.

The reissue of license plates as specified in section 49-443(2), Idaho Code, shall not be required unless there is a general consensus among the majority of plate holders that a new plate design is needed. Representatives of the plate holders shall make the request known to the department. The cost of manufacturing a new design will be set by the department based upon the cost of manufacturing supplies and administering the reissue. The equivalent cost of each plate will be charged to each plate holder who purchases the new plate. If a new plate design is authorized, the design and color shall be approved by representatives of the interest group. The design, color and numbering scheme shall also be subject to approval of the department. The existing plate design will be canceled and all plate holders, present and future shall purchase and display the new plate.

The department shall have the authority to refuse to issue a plate and may demand the return of such plate if the applicant has failed to comply with the provisions of this section.

§ 49-406A. Idaho classic — Special license plate program — Registration and standard license plates.

Any motor vehicle or motorcycle which is at least thirty (30) years old that does not qualify as an “Idaho Old Timer” and that is maintained to its original likeness using original-type parts and materials, without major modifications shall be known as an “Idaho Classic.” Any motor vehicle which is altered from its original design is not an “Idaho Classic” as herein defined.

Any motor vehicle or motorcycle which qualifies as an “Idaho Classic” shall be used for exhibits, parades, tours, club activities and such occasional use as is necessary for operation and maintenance of the vehicle, and shall not be used for business or commercial purposes or as customary and usual transportation.

Applicants for a special “Idaho Classic” license plate shall pay an initial program fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) and the license plate fee required in section 49-450, Idaho Code, for each Idaho classic plate which shall be displayed on the rear of the vehicle. The initial program fee shall be deposited in the state highway account, and the plate manufacturing fee shall be deposited in the plate manufacturing account.

Once every three (3) years, on a schedule set by the department, an ownership verification form shall be mailed to each plate holder on file with the department. The owner shall provide such information as is requested by the department to verify ownership of the vehicle(s) and that the special plate(s) is still in use by the owner. A fee of three dollars ($3.00) shall be charged by the department for each vehicle. This fee shall be deposited in the state highway account to defray costs of the license plate program. If the owner no longer has an interest in a vehicle(s) the owner may retain the plate as specified in subsection (7) of this section. If the ownership verification form is not returned by the date specified by the department, the registration record will be purged from the files of the department. Any use of the plate(s) is lost to the owner and the plate number becomes available for issue to another applicant.

An applicant for the special “Idaho Classic” plate shall execute an affidavit on a form provided by the department that the vehicle or motorcycle qualifies as an “Idaho Classic” and shall only be used for the purposes allowed.

The reissue of license plates as specified in section 49-443(2), Idaho Code, shall not be required unless there is a general consensus among the majority of plate holders that a new plate design is needed. Representatives of the plate holders shall make the request known to the department. The cost of manufacturing a new design will be set by the department based upon the cost of manufacturing supplies and administering the reissue. The equivalent cost of each plate will be charged to each plate holder who purchases the new plate. If a new plate design is authorized, the design and color shall be approved by representatives of the interest group. The design, color and numbering scheme shall also be subject to the approval of the department. The existing plate design will be canceled and all plate holders, present and future shall purchase and display the new plate.

The department shall have the authority to refuse to issue the plate and may demand the return of such plate if the applicant has failed to comply with the provisions of this section.
(6) If an “Idaho Classic” is to be used as customary and usual transportation, or for business or commercial purposes, the owner shall register the vehicle under the provisions of section 49-402, or section 49-434, Idaho Code, as applicable, and shall obtain and display the standard issue of license plates after payment of the plate fee required in section 49-450, Idaho Code. It shall be permissible to display both the standard issue of plates and the “Idaho Classic” plate.

(7) Whenever title or interest in an Idaho classic motor vehicle or motorcycle is transferred or assigned, the transferor may retain the special plate for use on another vehicle which qualifies by providing the information required in subsection (5) of this section and by paying the required transfer fee. If the vehicle is also registered under the provisions of section 49-402 or section 49-434, Idaho Code, the provisions of section 49-431, Idaho Code, relating to the procedure for assignment and transfer of interest, shall apply.

§ 49-407. Year of manufacture plate.

Pursuant to rules of the department, any person who is the owner of a motor vehicle with any model year up to and through 1974 which is registered under section 49-402(1), Idaho Code, or section 49-434(1), Idaho Code, may display on the rear of the vehicle an authentic Idaho plate manufactured with a painted or embossed year matching the model year of the vehicle. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds.

In addition to the regular registration fees required in sections 49-402(1), and 49-434(1), Idaho Code, the applicant shall pay the initial program fee and the annual program fee specified in section 49-402, Idaho Code. All revenues from the initial program fee and the annual program fee shall be deposited in the state highway account.

§ 49-408. Street rod.

Any motor vehicle manufactured prior to the year 1949, or designed and manufactured to resemble such a vehicle and which has been certified as a street rod may be registered as a street rod under the provisions of this section. However, the provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds.

Any street rod shall have all equipment in operating condition which was specifically required by law as a condition for its first sale after manufacture. No law requiring any particular equipment or specifying any standards to be met by motor vehicles shall apply to street rods unless it so specifically states.

Upon receipt of an application on a form prescribed by the department for a special street rod automobile plate, accompanied by other documentation required in this section, the department shall issue to the applicant a special street rod automobile plate which shall be displayed on the rear of the vehicle. The registration certificate need not specify the weight of the street rod, and the plate issued shall bear no date but shall bear the inscription “Street Rod,” “Idaho,” a picture of a 1929 highway roadster, and the registration number issued for the street rod, and the plate shall be valid upon annual renewal under section 49-402 or 49-434(1), Idaho Code, as long as the vehicle is in existence. The plate will be issued for the applicant’s use only for the particular vehicle, and in the event of a transfer of title, the transferor may hold the plate and transfer it to another qualifying street rod.

In addition to the regular registration fees required in section 49-402(1) or 49-434(1), Idaho Code, the applicant shall pay the initial program fee and the annual program fee specified in section 49-402, Idaho Code. All revenues from the initial program fee and the annual program fee shall be deposited in the state highway account.

The department has the power to revoke any registration issued under this section for cause shown for failure of the applicant to comply with the provisions of this section.

§ 49-409. Personalized license plates.

Any person who is the owner of a vehicle registered under section 49-402 or 49-434(1), Idaho Code, may apply to the department for personalized license plates in lieu of regular numbered plates except that this provision shall not apply to a vehicle registered under section 49-434(1), Idaho Code, with a maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds or any vehicle registered under section 49-435, Idaho Code. In addition to the regular registration fees required in section 49-402(1) and (2), section 49-422, and section 49-434(1), Idaho Code, the applicant shall pay the initial program fee and the annual program fee specified in section 49-402, Idaho Code. All revenues from the initial program fee and the annual program fee shall be deposited in the state highway account. The personalized license plates shall be of the same color and design as other license plates, and shall consist of numbers or letters, or any combination thereof, not exceeding seven (7) positions. No more than one (1) particular combination of letters and numbers shall be in existence at any one (1) time. The form for application of the plates will be as prescribed by the director who, at his discretion, may refuse to issue the plates.

When personalized license plates are issued for a vehicle, the regular license plates for that vehicle belong to the registrant and may be transferred to another vehicle owned by the personalized plate applicant.

§ 49-410. Special license plates and placards for persons with a disability — Parking privileges — Placards for certain temporarily disabled persons — Enforcement.

Any person with a disability as defined in section 49-117, Idaho Code, or any parent or guardian of a dependent child with a disability as defined in section 49-117, Idaho Code, without regard to the age of the dependent child, shall be eligible for the use of special license plates bearing the international accessible symbol, for any vehicle owned by such person or owned by a qualified parent or guardian, but excluding any commercial vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds. The parking privileges granted under the provisions of subsection (7) of this section shall apply to any vehicle displaying special license plates or placard issued pursuant to this section.

Registration and license plate fees for vehicles owned by a person with a disability or qualified parent or guardian of a dependent child with a disability, shall be as provided, respectively, in sections 49-402, 49-434(1) and 49-450, Idaho Code. Nothing in this section shall be construed as abrogating provisions of section 49-445, Idaho Code. The use of the special placard issued under the provisions of subsection (4) of this section, shall not exempt the owner of a motor vehicle from otherwise properly registering and licensing the motor vehicle.

Special license plates for persons with a disability and for the parent or guardian of a dependent child with a disability, shall be the same size and color as other license plates, and shall have displayed upon them the registration numbers assigned to the vehicle and to the owner. The plates shall be numbered in a manner prescribed by the department, but the plates shall display the international accessible symbol.

The department shall issue a special placard bearing the international accessible symbol and other information the department may require, to:

Any qualified person with a disability who does not own a motor vehicle;

Any qualified person with a disability who owns a motor vehicle, without regard to weight or use of the vehicle;

Any parent or guardian of a dependent child with a disability who owns a motor vehicle without regard to weight or use of the vehicle;

Any business entity which is engaged in transportation of persons with a disability, which business shall not be required to submit a physician’s certification. In addition to other application requirements, a business applicant shall sign a declaration that he is engaged in the transportation of persons with a disability. A business entity may include, but not be limited to, hospitals, nursing homes, federal, state and local governmental agencies and taxicabs.
(5) Any person or business issued a special placard shall affix the special placard to a motor vehicle in a conspicuous place designated by the department. The placard shall bear distinguishing marks, letters or numerals indicating the vehicle is utilized by a permanently disabled person. When the placard is affixed to a motor vehicle and the motor vehicle is transporting a person with a disability, special parking privileges are granted as provided in subsection (7) of this section.

§ 49-410A. Recertification required. [Null and void.]

§ 49-411. Dealer and manufacturer plate — Fees.

Any person conducting the business of manufacturing, buying, selling or dealing in vehicles, and licensed as a manufacturer of or a dealer in vehicles, and owning and operating any such vehicle upon any highway may, in lieu of registering each vehicle, obtain from the department upon application on the proper form and payment of the required fee, and attach to each vehicle, one (1) number plate as required for different classes of vehicles in section 49-434, Idaho Code. The special number plate shall bear a distinctive number assigned to the manufacturer or dealer, the name of this state, which may be abbreviated, and the year for which the plate is issued, together with words which may be abbreviated or a distinguishing symbol indicating that the plate is issued to a manufacturer or dealer.

Dealer license plates shall be limited to two (2) license plates for up to twenty (20) vehicles sold during the previous dealer licensing period and one (1) license plate for each ten (10) additional vehicles sold during the previous dealer licensing period. Any new dealer who applies for a dealer license shall be eligible for the number of dealer plates requested based on the number of vehicles that the dealer estimates he will sell during the first year of licensure.

Upon renewal of a dealer’s license, the department may audit vehicle sales from previous years to determine the number of dealer plates that will be authorized for the current dealer licensing period.

The fee to validate a dealer or manufacturer number plate shall be twelve dollars ($12.00) for each validation sticker.

All such fees shall be paid to the state treasurer and deposited to the state highway account.

Laden dealer or manufacturer plates shall be available to licensed dealers and manufacturers operating vehicles with laden loads in furtherance of their business pursuant to section 49-1627(5), Idaho Code. Such plates shall be exempt from the limit provisions of subsection (1)(a) of this section. The operating fee for a laden dealer or manufacturer plate will be equal to the fees for commercial vehicles pursuant to section 49-434(1), Idaho Code, for twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds. Laden dealer and manufacturer plates are limited to a maximum combined gross vehicle weight of twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds. Temporary weight increase permits may be purchased pursuant to section 49-432(2), Idaho Code.

§ 49-412. Vehicle dealer loaner plate.

A dealer, owning a vehicle may obtain, upon application to the department upon a proper form and payment of the fee required, and display on a vehicle loaned to a customer, a loaner vehicle number plate. The plate shall be the same design and numbering system as the plate issued for passenger vehicles or motorcycles.

The fee for each loaner plate or registration sticker shall be as provided in section 49-402(1), Idaho Code, for new vehicles.

All such fees shall be paid to the state treasurer and deposited to the state highway account.

§ 49-413. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-414. Legislative license plates — Fees.

Special legislative license plates shall be issued by the department upon application and payment of the required fees. Each legislator is eligible to register and receive special license plates for one (1) vehicle whose registered maximum gross weight does not exceed twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds. The registration period shall be for one (1) year, from January 1 through December 31, and may be renewed, as long as the legislator holds office. The plates shall bear either the inscription “House” or “Senate,” shall contain a consecutive numbering from one (1) through the maximum number of members in each body with the numbers to be assigned by the speaker of the house of representatives and the president pro tempore of the senate, and shall otherwise comply with the provisions of section 49-443, Idaho Code.

In addition to the regular registration fees required in section 49-402(1) or 49-434(1), Idaho Code, the applicant shall pay the initial program fee and the annual program fee as specified in section 49-402, Idaho Code. All revenues from the initial program fee and the annual program fee shall be deposited in the state highway account.

§ 49-415. Former prisoner of war license plates.

Any veteran, who was a prisoner of war (POW) of an armed enemy of the United States during active service in the armed forces of the United States, that service occurring during any portion of a recognized war period enumerated in this section, and who has been released or discharged from the armed forces under other than dishonorable conditions, may upon application to the department, register and receive for not more than two (2) motor vehicles, special former prisoner of war license plates in lieu of regular license plates. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds.

In addition to the regular registration fees required in section 49-402(1) or 49-434(1), Idaho Code, the applicant shall pay the plate fee required in section 49-450, Idaho Code. Whenever a former prisoner of war transfers or assigns his title or interest to a vehicle registered under this section the registration shall expire, but the former prisoner of war may hold the special plates and may have them transferred to another vehicle upon payment of the required transfer fee provided in section 49-431, Idaho Code. He may only display the plates after receipt of the new registration document from the department.

Former prisoner of war license plates shall bear the words “Former Prisoner of War” and a declaration of the period of service, and shall in all other respects be as provided by law.

Recognized war periods for the purpose of this section shall be any period of war recognized by the United States department of veterans affairs for the purpose of awarding federal veterans benefits as may be defined in title 38, U.S. code, chapter 1, section 101(11).

Former prisoner of war license plates may be retained and displayed on vehicles owned by the surviving spouse of a deceased former prisoner of war. In addition, the surviving spouse of the deceased former prisoner of war is eligible to reapply for and shall be issued former prisoner of war license plates if the deceased former prisoner of war died on or after January 1 of the five (5) years preceding the date of reapplication for the plates. Such plates shall be used on a vehicle owned by the surviving spouse.

§ 49-415A. Congressional medal of honor license plates.

Congressional medal of honor license plates are available to applicants who furnish proof of entitlement by certification from the United States Veterans Administration attesting to their status as a congressional medal of honor recipient.

The license plates shall be provided free of charge. The applicant shall pay the regular annual registration fees required by section 49-402 or 49-434(1), Idaho Code. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds. If the plate holder transfers his title or interest to a vehicle registered under this section, the plates may be transferred to another vehicle owned by the plate holder. If the plates are unexpired, the plate holder shall be given credit for the unexpired portion of the registration fee against the new registration fee. The transfer fee specified by section 49-431(1), Idaho Code, shall apply.

These provisions shall apply to the vehicle to which the plates were originally issued and to any vehicle subsequently purchased and owned by the medal of honor recipient, except that the privilege shall not extend to more than two (2) vehicles at a time.

Congressional medal of honor license plates may be retained and displayed on vehicles owned by the surviving spouse of a deceased congressional medal of honor recipient. In addition, the surviving spouse of a deceased congressional medal of honor recipient is eligible to reapply for and shall be issued congressional medal of honor license plates if the deceased congressional medal of honor recipient died on or after January 1 of the five (5) years preceding the date of reapplication for the plates. Such plates shall be used on a vehicle owned by the surviving spouse.

§ 49-415B. Pearl Harbor survivor special plates.

Any veteran who was on active duty in the armed forces of the United States and assigned or stationed at Pearl Harbor, Hawaii, or within three (3) miles of the island of Oahu on December 7, 1941, and who has been released or discharged from the armed forces under other than dishonorable conditions, may upon application to the department, register and receive for not more than two (2) motor vehicles, special Pearl Harbor survivor number plates in lieu of regular number plates. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds.

In addition to the regular registration fees required in section 49-402(1) or 49-434(1), Idaho Code, the applicant shall be charged the plate fee required in section 49-450, Idaho Code. Whenever a qualifying survivor of the Japanese attack on Pearl Harbor on December 7, 1941, transfers or assigns his title or interest to a vehicle especially registered under this section, the registration shall expire, but the Pearl Harbor survivor may hold his special plates which he may have reissued to him upon the payment of the required transfer fees. He may only display those plates after receipt of a new registration from the department.

Pearl Harbor survivor plates shall bear the characters: “Pearl Harbor Survivor” and shall in all other respects be as provided by law.

Pearl Harbor survivor license plates may be retained and displayed on vehicles owned by the surviving spouse of a deceased Pearl Harbor survivor veteran. In addition, the surviving spouse of a deceased Pearl Harbor survivor veteran is eligible to reapply for and shall be issued Pearl Harbor survivor license plates if the deceased Pearl Harbor survivor veteran died on or after January 1 of the five (5) years preceding the date of reapplication for the plates. Such plates shall be used on a vehicle owned by the surviving spouse.

§ 49-415C. National rifle association license plates. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 233, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 49-415D. Support our troops plates.

On and after January 1, 2008, any person who is the owner of a vehicle registered under the provisions of section 49-402, Idaho Code, or registered under any other section of law for which the purchase of special plates is allowed, may apply for and, upon department approval, receive support our troops license plates in lieu of regular license plates. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds. Availability of support our troops license plates for other vehicles shall be subject to the rules, policies and procedures of the department.

In addition to the regular registration fee required in chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, the applicant shall be charged a fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) for the initial issuance of plates, and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) upon each succeeding annual registration. Ten dollars ($10.00) of the initial fee and ten dollars ($10.00) of the renewal fee shall be deposited in the state highway account and shall be used to fund the cost of administration of this special license plate program. Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) of each initial fee and fifteen dollars ($15.00) of each renewal fee shall be transferred by the state treasurer for deposit to the Idaho support our troops, inc.’s principal office located in Boise, Idaho, and shall be used by the Idaho support our troops, inc. as administrator of the funds, to provide support and assistance to the children, dependents and spouses of military service members and armed forces members of the army, navy, air force, marine corps, national guard, coast guard and air national guard and reserves.

Whenever title or interest in a vehicle registered under the provisions of this section is transferred or assigned, the owner may transfer the special plates to another vehicle upon payment of the required transfer fees. The owner may only display the plates on another vehicle upon receipt of the new registration from the department.

The support our troops license plate shall be of a color and design in accordance with the provisions of section 49-402C, Idaho Code. The design and any slogan on the plate shall be acceptable to the board of directors of the Idaho support our troops, inc. and shall be approved by the Idaho transportation department utilizing a numbering system as determined by the department. Initial costs of the plate program, including costs of plate design, shall be paid by the Idaho support our troops, inc.

Sample support our troops license plates may be purchased for a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00), ten dollars ($10.00) of which shall be deposited in the state highway account and twenty dollars ($20.00) of which shall be transferred to the Idaho support our troops, inc.’s principal office located in Boise, Idaho, and shall be used to provide support and assistance to the children, dependents and spouses of military service members and armed forces members of the army, navy, air force, marine corps, national guard, coast guard and air national guard and reserves.

§ 49-415E. Idaho 2009 special olympics world winter games plates. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 233, § 3, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 49-415F. [Reserved.]

Any person or business who is the owner of a trailer or semitrailer registered under the provisions of subsection (4)(a) of section 49-434, Idaho Code, may apply for and, upon department approval, may receive a special permanent or business logo license plate of the owner’s company.

In addition to the registration fee required in section 49-434(4)(a), Idaho Code, an applicant for a business logo plate shall pay the estimated initial programming costs, which fees shall be deposited in the state highway account. The business logo plate shall be of a color and design in accordance with the provisions of section 49-402C, Idaho Code, and acceptable to the owner or business and shall be approved by the department and utilize a numbering system as determined by the department.

Whenever title or interest in a trailer or semitrailer registered under the provisions of this section is transferred or reassigned, the plates issued pursuant to subsection (4)(a) of section 49-434, Idaho Code, are nontransferable and the registration fee is nonrefundable.

The north America permanent trailer plate program shall be subject to the provisions of section 49-402C, Idaho Code.

Any specific business logo plate program created under this section shall be discontinued if no plates are issued under the program for two (2) consecutive years after the year of implementation.

Sample special permanent or business logo license plates may be purchased for a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00), which shall be placed in the state highway account.

§ 49-416. Statehood centennial license plates.

Statehood centennial license plates are available to owners of motor vehicles required to be registered under section 49-402(1) or section 49-434(1), Idaho Code, upon application at a county assessor’s office or at the department. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds. Availability of statehood centennial plates for other classes of vehicle registrations shall be as authorized by rule of the department. In addition to the regular registration fees required in section 49-402(1) or 49-434(1), Idaho Code, the applicant shall pay the initial program fee and the annual program fee as specified in section 49-402, Idaho Code. All revenues from such initial registration and annual renewal fees shall be deposited in the highway distribution account.

The statehood centennial license plates shall be of a color and design approved by the department, utilizing a numbering system approved by the board. The statehood centennial license plates must be surrendered upon failure to pay the annual special fee and renewal fees.

Any person who applies for statehood centennial license plates, may also apply for personalized numbers and/or letters on those plates, as provided for in section 49-409, Idaho Code.

§ 49-416A. Historic Lewiston plates. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 233, § 4, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 49-416B. Basque plates. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 233, § 5, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 49-416C. Innovation plates. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 233, § 6, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 49-416D. Idaho state historic preservation plates. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 233, § 7, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 49-416E. Breast cancer education and screening plates. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 233, § 8, effective July 1, 2017.